ro-RO: Tip formă paste: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagna; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Altele
en: Pasta shape type: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagna; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Other
tr: Makarna şekli türü: Kelebek makarna; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lazanya; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spagetti; Tortellini; Diğer
nl: Type pastavorm: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagna; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Andere
ja: パスタの形状種類: ファルファッレ; フェットチーネ; ニョッキ; ラザニア; リングイネ; ペンネ; ラビオリ; リガトーニ; スパゲッティ; トルテリーニ; その他
el: Τύπος σχήματος ζυμαρικών: Φαρφάλες; Φετουτσίνι; Νιόκι; Λαζάνια; Λιγκουίνι; Πένες; Ραβιόλι; Ριγκατόνι; Σπαγκέτι; Τορτελίνι; Άλλο
da: Pastaformtype: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagne; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Andet
fi: Pastan muodon tyyppi: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagne; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de formato de macarrão: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Nhoque; Lasanha; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Espaguete; Tortellini; Outro
sv: Pastaform: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagne; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Övrigt
it: Tipo di pasta: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagna; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Altro
bg-BG: Тип форма на паста: Фарфале; Фетучини; Ньоки; Лазаня; Лингуини; Пене; Равиоли; Ригатони; Спагети; Тортелини; Други
hr-HR: Oblik tjestenine: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Njoki; Lazanje; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Špageti; Tortelini; Ostalo
fr: Type de forme des pâtes: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagne; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Autre
hu: Tésztaforma típusa: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagna; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Egyéb
lt-LT: Makaronų forma: Kaspinėliai; Fetučiniai; Njokiai; Lasanija; Linguine; Vamzdeliai; Ravioliai; Rigatoni; Spagečiai; Torteliniai; Kita
ko: 파스타 모양 유형: 파르팔레; 페투치니; 뇨끼; 라자냐; 링귀니; 펜네; 라비올리; 리가토니; 스파게티; 토르텔리니; 기타
pl: Typ kształtu makaronu: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lazania; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Inne
nb: Pastaformtype: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagne; Linguini; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Annet
es: Tipo de forma de pasta: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagna; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Otros
zh-CN: 面食形状类型: 蝴蝶面; 意大利宽面条; 团子; 烤宽面条; 意大利扁面条; 通心粉; 馄饨; 通心粉; 意大利细面条; 意大利饺子; 其他
th: ประเภทรูปทรงของพาสต้า: ฟาร์เฟลเล; เฟตตูชินี่; ญ็อกกี; ลาซานญ่า; ลิงกวินี่; เพนเน่; ราวีโอลี่; ริกาโตนี่; สปาเก็ตตี้; ทอร์เทลลินี; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип формы пасты: Фарфалле; Феттучини; Ньокки; Лазанья; Лингвини; Пенне; Равиоли; Ригатони; Спагетти; Тортеллини; Другой
pt-PT: Tipo de forma da massa: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasanha; Linguini; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Esparguete; Tortellini; Outro
sk-SK: Typ tvaru cestovín: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagne; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Špagety; Tortellini; Iné
cs: Typ tvaru těstovin: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagne; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Špagety; Tortellini; Jiné
zh-TW: 麵食形狀類型: 蝴蝶麵; 義大利寬麵條; 湯團; 寬麵條; 扁麵條; 通心粉; 餛飩; 通心粉; 義大利細麵條; 義大利水餃; 其他
de: Art der Nudelform: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Gnocchi; Lasagne; Linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta oblike testenin: Farfalle; Fettuccine; Njoki; Lazanja; Linguine; Peresniki; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Špageti; Tortelini; Drugo
vi: Loại mì ống: Nui hình nơ; Hình bún phở; Nhoki; Lasagna; Mì linguine; Penne; Ravioli; Rigatoni; Spaghetti; Tortellini; Khác